morphology/analyzer_foma/quechua-with-translations.foma
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # delete all tags and special chars in surface forms     #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define Cleanup1  [["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@RI"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@NTIN"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@NAWPA"|"@2SUBJ"] -> ""];
       define Cleanup2 ["" <- ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@RI"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@NTIN"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@NAWPA"|"@2SUBJ"]];
############################################################################### 

          #########################
          #                       #
          # PHONETIC RULES        #
          #                       #
          #########################

      define Vowels [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|"@TA"|{pa}"@PA"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@NAWPA"|"@ALLI"];
      define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z|'|{m}"@MU"|{m}"@MI"|{s}"@SI"|{ch}"@CHA"|{ntin}"@NTIN"|{p}"@PA"|{q}"@PA"|"@AS"];

      #--------------------------------#
      # allow upper/lower case letters #
      #--------------------------------#

      define Lowercase [A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c,D (->) d,E (->) e,F (->) f,G (->) g,H (->) h,I (->) i,J (->) j,K (->) k,L (->) l,M (->) m,N (->) n,O (->) o,P (->) p,Q (->) q,R (->) r,S (->) s,T (->) t,U (->) u,V (->) v,W (->) w,X (->) x,Y (->) y,Z (->) z,Ñ (->) ñ];

      define UpperCase [ a (->) A,b (->) B,c (->) C,d (->) D,e (->) E,f (->) F,g (->) G,h (->) H,i (->) I,j (->) J,k (->) K,l (->) L,m (->) M,n (->) N,o (->) O,p (->) P,q (->) Q,r (->) R,s (->) S,t (->) T,u (->) U,v (->) V,w (->) W,x (->) X,y (->) Y,z (->) Z,ñ (->) Ñ];


      #-------------------------------------------------------------#
      # Allow 'i' to be written as 'e' in neighbourhood to 'q' and  #
      # allow 'u' to be written as 'o' in those contexts            #
      #-------------------------------------------------------------#

      define Allophone1 [ u (->) o||  _ (s|t|n|r|l) q, q (s|t|n|r|h|l|') _  , _ (s|t|n|r|l){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|h|l|') _ ] .o. [i (->) e || _ (s|t|n|r|h|l) q, q (s|t|n|r|l|ll|h|') _ , _ (s|t|n|r|h|l){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|l|ll|') _  ];


      define Allophone2 [ m (->) n || _ p ];
      define Allophone3 [ {ll} (->) l || _ q];
      define Allophones Allophone1 .o. Allophone2 .o. Allophone3;

      define Apo [' (->) ’];
  

       #----------------------------------------#
       # alternative spellings for some letters #
       #----------------------------------------#

       define Orthography1 [ {q} (->) {cc}];
       define Orthography2 [ {wi} (->) {hui}];
       define Orthography3 [ {wa} (->) {hua}];
       define Orthography4 [ {w} (->) {u} || {a}_ ];
       define Orthography5 [ {h} (->) {j}];
       define Orthography6 [ {ch} (->) {ts}];
       define Orthography7 [ {a} (->) {á},{á} (->) {a} ,{e} (->) {é},{i} (->) {í}, {o} (->) {ó},{u} (->) {ú}];
       define Orthography [Orthography1 .o. Orthography2 .o. Orthography3 .o. Orthography4 .o. Orthography5 .o.  Orthography6 .o. Orthography7];

       define QuechuaOrtho Allophones .o. Orthography;

       #-------------------------------------------------------#
       # orthography of Spanish loan words:                    #
       # vowels may bear the original accent or not            #
       # 'e' may be written as 'i', 'o' may be written as 'u'  #
       #-------------------------------------------------------#

       define Accent [ á (->) a,é (->) [e|i],í (->) i, ó (->) [o|u],ú (->) u, ü (->) u];
       define Accent2 [ a (->) á,e (->) é, i (->) í,o (->) ó, u (->) ú, u (->) ü ];
       define spanLetras [ e (->) i, i (->) e, o (->) u, u (->) o, c (->) k , d (->) t, g (->)j, w  (->) o, b (->) p, v (->) w, z (->) s , j (->) h];
       define SpanOrtho Accent .o. Accent2 .o. spanLetras;

########################################################################
########################################################################
##                                                                    ##
##               MORPHO-PHONOLOGICAL RULES                            ##
##                                                                    ##
########################################################################
########################################################################

      ###########
      # NOMINAL #
      ###########

      #------------------------------------------------------------------#
      # possessive -nkuna is ambigous: -n-kuna (3.Sg) or nku-kuna (3.Pl) #
      #------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define 3PossPl  [  "+3.Pl.Poss" (<-) "+3.Sg.Poss" \\  _ "+Pl" ];

       #----------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # possessive -ykuna is ambigous: y-kuna (1.Sg) or yku-kuna (1.Pl.Excl) #
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define 2PossPl [ "+1.Pl.Excl.Poss" (<-) "+1.Sg.Poss" \\  _ "+Pl" ];

       define PossessivePlural [3PossPl .o. 2PossPl];

       #---------------------------------------------------------------#
       # genitive is -pa after consonant, but may be -q/-p after vowel #
       #---------------------------------------------------------------#
       define GENITIVE [ {pa}"@PA" (->) [{p}|{q}]"@PA"  ||Vowels  _ ];

       #------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessivformen euphon. -ni/-ñi nach Konsonant #
       #------------------------------------------------#

       define POSSESSIVE1 [ {@POSS} -> [{ni}|{ñi}]  || Cons _ ];
       define POSSESSIVE2 [ {@POSS} ->  "" || Vowels _ ];
       define POSSESSIVE POSSESSIVE1 .o. POSSESSIVE2;

       define NounRules GENITIVE .o. POSSESSIVE;


       ##########
       # VERBAL #
       ##########

       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # reciprocal '-na' has to be followes by -ku, -chi or -spa (heuristic to avoid confusions with obligative -'na') #
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define naRzpr [  "+Rzpr"  => _ ?* ["+Rflx_Int"|"+Caus"|"+SS"|"+DS"] ];

       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # irregular person marking in transitive verbs -su .. -nki (3.Sg > 2.Sg, not 2.Sg > 2.Sg)  #
       # also: -su .. nkichis, -wa ..sun(chis), -wa.. nku, -wa .. -nqaku                          #
       # object will remain underspecified 2.Obj or 1.Obj (instead of specific 1.Pl.Excl/Incl.Obj #
       # where this would be the exact reading)                                                   #
       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define TransSubj1 [ "+3.Sg.Subj" <- "+2.Sg.Subj" ||  ["+2.Obj"] ?* _ ]; #sunki
       define TransSubj2 [ "+3.Sg.Subj" <- "+2.Pl.Subj" ||  ["+2.Obj"] ?* _ ]; #sunkichis
       define TransSubj3 [ "+3.Sg.Subj" <- "+1.Pl.Incl.Subj.Fut" ||  ["+1.Obj"] ?+ _ ]; #wasun
       define TransSubj4 [ "+3.Sg.Subj" <- "+1.Pl.Incl.Imp" ||  ["+1.Obj"] ?+ _ ]; #wasun
       define TransSubj5 [ "+3.Sg.Subj" <- "+3.Pl.Subj.Fut" ||  ["+1.Obj"] ?+ _ ]; #wanqaku
       define TransSubj6 [ "+3.Subj" <- "+3.Pl.Subj" ||  ["+1.Obj"] ?+ _ ]; #wanku 

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # -nkiku as 2.Sg.Subj has to preceded by -wa (-wankiku -> 1.Pl.Excl.Obj, 2.Sg.Subj) #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define TransSubj7 [  "@2SUBJ""+2.Sg.Subj" => "+1.Obj" ?+ _ ];

       define VerbRulesUpper  naRzpr .o. TransSubj1 .o. TransSubj2 .o. TransSubj3 .o. TransSubj4 .o. TransSubj5 .o. TransSubj6 .o. TransSubj7;

       #---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # '-rqu' repentine --> '-rqa' before '-mu', '-pu' , '-ri' , '-ysi' (and optional (?) '-ru' --> '-ra' before -ku #
       # -rqu may become -rqa also before -cha (verbal diminutive), e.g. qaparqachay (optional?)                       #
       #---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define rqurqa1 [ {rqu}"@RQU"-> {rqa}"@RQU" || _ ?* [{mu}"@MU"|{pu}"@PU"|{ysi}"@YSI"|{chi}"@CHI"|{ri}"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa2 [ {ru}"@RQU"-> {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* [{mu}"@MU"|{pu}"@PU"|{ysi}"@YSI"|{chi}"@CHI"|{ri}"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa3 [ {rqu}"@RQU"(->) {rqa}"@RQU" || _ [{ku}"@KU"|{cha}"@Vdim"]];
       define rqurqa4 [ {ru}"@RQU" (->) {ra}"@RQU" || _ [{ku}"@KU"|{cha}"@Vdim"]];

       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # '-yku' affective --> -yka before '-mu', '-pu', '-ysi', '-chi', '-ri', '-cha' and '-na' #
       # resp. '-yu' --> '-ya'                                                                  #
       #----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define ykuyka1 [ {yku}"@YKU" -> {yka}"@YKU" || _ ?* [{mu}"@MU"|{pu}"@PU"|{ysi}"@YSI"|{chi}"@CHI"|{ri}"@RI"]];
       define ykuyka2 [ {yu}"@YU" -> {ya}"@YU" || _ ?* [{mu}"@MU"|{pu}"@PU"|{ysi}"@YSI"|{chi}"@CHI"|{ri}"@RI"]];

       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # '-mu' translokative --> '-m' before '-pu'                                          #
       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define mpuDIR [ {mu}"@MU" -> {m}"@MU"  ||  _ {pu}"@PU" ];

       #---------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # '-pu' regressive --> '-pa' before '-ku' and '-mu'                               #
       #---------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define pupa [ {pu}"@PU" -> {pa}"@PU" ||  _  [{ku}"@KU"|{mu}"@MU"|{m}"@MU"] ];

       #----------------------------------------------------------#
       # '-ku' reflexive --> '-ka' before '-chi', '-pu' and '-mu' #
       #----------------------------------------------------------#
       define kuka [ {ku}"@KU" -> {ka}"@KU" ||  _  ?* [{mu}"@MU"|{m}"@MU"|{chi}"@CHI"|{pu}"@PU"] ];

       define VerbRulesLower rqurqa1 .o. rqurqa2 .o. rqurqa3 .o. rqurqa4 .o. ykuyka1 .o. ykuyka2 .o. mpuDIR .o. pupa .o. kuka;


       ##############
       # AMBIVALENT #
       ##############

       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # evidential suffixes '-mi', '-si', '-cha' get shortened to '-m', '-s', '-ch' after vowel.            #
       # apply rule on complete word form, as these suffixes may be attached directly to the root, and the   #
       # left context has to be known for the rule to match                                                  #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define EVID1 [ {mi}"@MI" -> [{m}|{n}]"@MI"  ||Vowels  _ ];
       define EVID2 [ {si}"@SI" -> {s}"@SI" || Vowels  _ ];
       define EVID3 [ {chi}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowels  _ ];
       define EVID4 [ {cha}"@CHA" -> {ch}"@CHA" || Vowels  _ ];

       define AmbiRules EVID1 .o. EVID2 .o. EVID3 .o. EVID4;


#################################################################################
